Hawaii statutes.
§572-11 Marriage ceremony; license to
solemnize. It shall not be lawful for any person to perform the marriage
ceremony within the State without first obtaining from the department of health
a license to solemnize marriages. [CC 1859, §1283; RL 1925, §2949; am L 1929, c
104, §5; RL 1935, §4639; RL 1945, §12360; RL 1955, §323-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §19; HRS §572-11; am L 1969, c 19, §1]

Case Notes

License is necessary, but marriage may be presumed although
no proof of license. Presumption is rebuttable. 34 H. 161.

Cited: 16 H. 377, 379; 74 H. 530, 852 P.2d 44.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next